Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-885.56
Team leader.

A team leader shall be responsible for supervising the real estate activities of his or her team performed under the Nebraska Real Estate License Act subject to the overall supervision by the designated broker of the team leader and team members.

Laws 2016, LB678, § 3.